Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2443.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Dependent" means a person enrolled as a dependent in the defense enrollment eligibility reporting system.(2) "Eligible student" means a reservist of the armed forces reserve domiciled or stationed in Washington state or the spouse or dependent of, also domiciled in Washington state, and designated by, a reservist who agrees to fulfill his or her service obligation and meets any additional selection criteria adopted by the office and all of the following participation requirements:(a) Is enrolled in courses or a program that lead to a postsecondary degree or certificate at an institution of higher education located in the state and accredited by the Northwest association of schools and colleges, or an institution that is located in the state that provides approved training under the Montgomery GI Bill;(b) Is an active drilling reservist, or the spouse or dependent of, and designated by, an active drilling reservist. The reservist must be in good standing in the armed forces reserve stationed in Washington state as specified in rules adopted by the office for implementation of the grant;(c) Has completed and submitted an application for student aid approved by the office; and(d) Is a resident student as defined in RCW 28B.15.012.(3) "Forgiven" or "to forgive" or "forgiveness" means either to render service in the armed forces reserve in lieu of monetary repayment, or to be relieved of the service obligation under rules adopted by the office.(4) "Grant" means the armed forces reserve postsecondary education grant established in section 2 of this act.(5) "Maximum benefit" means the maximum grant a reservist and the reservist's spouse and dependents are eligible to receive.(6) "Office" means the office of student financial assistance created in RCW 28B.76.090.(7) "Participant" means an eligible student who has received a grant under this chapter.(8) "Reservist" means a member of the armed forces reserve stationed in Washington state who has received, or whose spouse or dependent has received, a grant under this chapter.(9) "Service obligation" means an obligation by the reservist to serve in the armed forces reserve for a time period of at least one year of service in the armed forces reserve for each year the participant receives a grant.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. Subject to amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the armed forces reserve postsecondary education grant program is established. The office shall administer the program. In administering the program, the powers and duties of the office include:(1) With the assistance of the Washington military department, the selection of eligible students to receive the grant as follows:(a) An eligible student may receive a grant under this section to help pay for postsecondary education program costs as approved by the office. Grants may not:(i) Exceed the maximum Washington college grant as defined in RCW 28B.92.030, plus $500 for books and supplies;(ii) Exceed the participant's cost of attendance, when combined with all other public and private grants, scholarships, and waiver assistance the participant receives; or(iii) Result in reduction of a participant's federal or other state financial aid;(b) The Washington military department shall ensure that data needed to identify eligible students is promptly transmitted to the office;(c) The annual amount of each grant may vary, but may not exceed the annual cost of undergraduate tuition fees and services and activities fees at the University of Washington, plus an allowance for books and supplies;(d) The maximum benefit a single reservist, or a combination of the reservist and the reservist's designated spouse or dependents, may receive may not extend beyond six full-time years, or the credit or clock-hour equivalent;(2) The award of grants funded by federal and state funds, private donations, or repayments from any participant who does not complete the participant's service obligation;(3) The adoption of necessary rules and policies, including establishing a priority for eligible students attending an institution of higher education located in this state that is accredited by the Northwest association of schools and colleges;(4) The adoption of participant selection criteria. The criteria may include, but need not be limited to, requirements for: Satisfactory academic progress, enrollment in courses or programs that lead to a baccalaureate degree or an associate degree or a certificate, and satisfactory participation as a reservist in the armed forces reserve;(5) With the assistance of the Washington military department, the notification of reservists of their additional service obligation or required repayment of the grant; and(6) The collection of repayments from reservists who do not meet the service obligations.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. (1) Reservists incur an obligation to repay the grant, with interest, unless they serve in the armed forces reserve for one year for each year they or their spouse or dependent received the grant, under rules adopted by the office.(2) The office shall adopt rules addressing the terms for repayment, including applicable interest rates, fees, deferments, and appeals, by a reservist who does not render service as a reservist in the armed forces reserve necessary to satisfy his or her service obligation.(3) The office is responsible for collection of repayments made under this section. The office shall exercise due diligence in such collection, maintaining all necessary records to ensure that maximum repayments are made. Collection and servicing of repayments under this section must be pursued using the full extent of law, including wage garnishment if necessary. The office is responsible to forgive all or parts of such repayments under the criteria established in this section, and shall maintain all necessary records of forgiven payments.(4) Receipts from the payment of principal or interest paid by or on behalf of participants must be deposited with the office and must be used to cover the costs of administration of the grant, maintaining necessary records, and making collections under subsection (3) of this section. The office shall maintain accurate records of these costs, and all receipts beyond those necessary to pay such costs must be used to make grant awards to eligible students.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. A reservist and the reservist's designated spouse and dependents may simultaneously use the grant, subject to any rules adopted by the office, and the limitation on the maximum benefit.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. Sections 1 through 4 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 28B RCW.--- END ---